Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4910
Compliance with act; when.

No insurer may continue to utilize the services of a managing general agent on and after January 1, 1991, unless such utilization is in compliance with the Managing General Agents Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 121.